en: E500, Sodium carbonates
xx: E500
bg: E500, Натриеви карбонати
ca: E500, Carbonats de sodi
cs: E500, Uhličitany sodné
da: E500, natriumkarbonater, natriumcarbonater
de: E500, Natriumcarbonate
el: E500, Ανθρακικά νάτρια
es: E500, Carbonatos de sodio
et: E500, Naatriumkarbonaadid
fi: E500, natriumkarbonaatit
fr: E500, Carbonates de sodium
he: E500, קרבונטים של נתרן, נתרן קרבונט, נתרן ביקרבונט, נתרן מימן-קרבונט, נתרן ססקויקרבונט, סודיום קרבונטים, סודיום קרבונט
hr: E500, natrijevi karbonati, natrij karbonati
hu: E500, nátrium-karbonátok
it: E500, Carbonati di sodio
lt: E500, Natrio karbonatai
lv: E500, Nātrija karbonāti
mt: E500, Karbonati tas-sodju
nb: E500, Natriumkarbonater
nl: E500, Natriumcarbonaten
nn: E500, natriumkarbonater
pl: E500, Węglany sodu
pt: E500, Carbonatos de sódio
ro: E500, Carbonati de sodiu, carbonați de sodiu
ru: E500, Карбонаты натрия
sk: E500, Uhličitany sodné
sl: E500, Natrijevi karbonati
sv: E500, natriumkarbonater
tr: E500

en: E500(i), Sodium carbonate, washing soda
xx: E500(i)
ar: E500(i), كربونات الصوديوم
ba: E500(i), Кальцирланған сода
bg: E500(i), Натриев карбонат, Калцинирана сода, Динатриев карбонат
bn: E500(i), সোডিয়াম কার্বনেট
bs: E500(i), Natrij-karbonat
ca: E500(i), carbonat de sodi
cs: E500(i), Uhličitan sodný, Bezvodý uhličitan sodný, Soda na praní
da: E500(i), natriumkarbonat, natriumcarbonat, soda
de: E500(i), Natriumcarbonat, Natriumkarbonat, Natriumkarbonate, Calciniertes Soda, Calcinierte Soda, Waschsoda, Kalzinierte Soda, Kalziniertes Soda
el: E500(i), Ανθρακικα αλατα του νατριου
eo: E500(i), natria karbonato
es: E500(i), Carbonato sódico, Carbonato de sodio, Sosa comercial
et: E500(i), Naatriumkarbonaat
fa: E500(i), سدیم کربنات
fi: E500(i), , Sooda, Pesusooda, Natriumkarbonaattidekahydraatti, Natriumkarbonaatti, Natriitti, Kidesooda, Natriumkarbonaattimonohydraatti, Soodaa, Pesusoodaa, Natriumkarbonaattidekahydraattia, Natriumkarbonaattia, Natriittia, Kidesoodaa, Natriumkarbonaattimonohydraattia
fr: E500(i), Carbonate de sodium, Carbonate de soude, Cristaux de soude
gv: E500(i), Carboanaayt sodjum
he: E500(i), נתרן פחמתי
hi: E500(i), क्षारातु प्रांगारीय
hr: E500(i), Natrijev karbonat
hu: E500(i), Nátrium-karbonát, szóda, sziksó, mosószóda, kalcinált szóda
id: E500(i), Natrium karbonat
it: E500(i), Carbonato di sodio, Carbonato di disodio, Carbonato sodico, Soda, Soda Solvay
ja: E500(i), 炭酸ナトリウム, 炭酸Na, 炭酸Ｎａ
ko: E500(i), 탄산 나트륨
lt: E500(i), Natrio karbonatas, Kalcinuota soda
lv: E500(i), Nātrija karbonāts
mk: E500(i), натриум карбонат
ml: E500(i), സോഡിയം കാർബണേറ്റ്
mt: E500(i), Karbonat tas-sodju
nb: E500(i), Natriumkarbonat
nl: E500(i), Natriumcarbonaat, Huishoudsoda, Dinatriumcarbonaat
nn: E500(i), natriumkarbonat
oc: E500(i), Carbonat de sòdi
pl: E500(i), Węglan sodu, Soda amoniakalna, soda bezwodna, Soda kalcynowana
pt: E500(i), Carbonato de sódio, Barrilha
ro: E500(i), Carbonat de sodiu, Soda
ru: E500(i), карбонат натрия, Натрия карбонат, Сода стиральная, Кальценированная сода, Кристаллическая сода, Кальцинированная сода
sh: E500(i), Natrijum karbonat
sk: E500(i), Uhličitan sodný, Bezvodá sóda, Sóda
sl: E500(i), Natrijev karbonat
sq: E500(i), Karbonati i natriumit
sr: E500(i), натријум карбонат
sv: E500(i), Natriumkarbonat
ta: E500(i), சோடியம் காபனேற்று
te: E500(i), సోడియమ్ కార్బొనేట్
th: E500(i), โซเดียมคาร์บอเนต
tr: E500(i), Sodyum karbonat
uk: E500(i), Карбонат натрію
ur: E500(i), صودا دردار
uz: E500(i), Natriy karbonat
vi: E500(i), Natri carbonat
zh: E500(i), 碳酸钠

en: E500(ii), Sodium hydrogen carbonate, Sodium bicarbonate, sodium acid carbonate, Bicarbonate of soda, baking soda
xx: E500(ii)
af: E500(ii), Natriumbikarbonaat
ar: E500(ii), بيكربونات الصوديوم
bg: E500(ii), Натриев хидроген карбонат, Натриев бикарбонат, натриев кисел карбонат, сода бикарбонат, Натриев хидрогенкарбонат
bn: E500(ii), সোডিয়াম বাইকার্বনেট
bs: E500(ii), Natrij-hidrogenkarbonat
ca: E500(ii), Bicarbonat de sodi, carbonat àcid de sodi, Bicarbonat sòdic, hidrogencarbonat de sodi
cs: E500(ii), Hydrogenuhličitan sodný, Kyselý uhličitan sodný, bikarbonát sodný
cy: E500(ii), sodiwm deucarbonad
da: E500(ii), natriumhydrogenkarbonat, natriumbikarbonat, surt natriumkarbonat, natriumhydrogencarbonat, natriumbicarbonat, surt natriumcarbonat, natron
de: E500(ii), Natriumhydrogencarbonat, Natriumbicarbonat, doppeltkohlensaures Natrium, doppeltkohlensaures Natron
el: E500(ii), Οξινο ανθρακικο νατριο, Διττανθρακικό νάτριο, όξινο ανθρακικό νάτριο, διττανθρακική σόδα
eo: E500(ii), natria bikarbonato
es: E500(ii), Bicarbonato de sodio, Carbonato ácido de sodio, Bicarbonato sódico, bicarbonatado de sodio
et: E500(ii), Naatriumvesinikkarbonaat, Söögisooda
eu: E500(ii), sodio hidrogenokarbonato
fa: E500(ii), جوش شیرین
fi: E500(ii), Natriumvetykarbonaatti, Natriumbikarbonaatti, hapan natriumkarbonaatti, Natriumvetykarbonaattia, Natriumbikarbonaattia, Ruokasooda
fr: E500(ii), Carbonate acide de sodium, hydrogénocarbonate de sodium, bicarbonate de sodium alimentaire, bicarbonate de soude, bicarbonate de sodium
gl: E500(ii), Bicarbonato de sodio
gu: E500(ii), ખાવાનો સોડા
he: E500(ii), סודה לשתייה
hi: E500(ii), सोडियम बाईकार्बोनेट
hr: E500(ii), Natrijev hidrogenkarbonat, natrijev hidrogen karbonat, natrijev bikarbonat, natrijevi hidrogenkarbonat, natrijevi hidrogenkarbonati, soda bikarbona
hu: E500(ii), Nátrium-hidrogén-karbonát, Nátrium-bikarbonát, Savas nátrium-karbonát, Szódabikarbóna
hy: E500(ii), Սոդա
ia: E500(ii), Bicarbonato de Sodium
id: E500(ii), Natrium bikarbonat
is: E500(ii), Matarsódi
it: E500(ii), Carbonato acido di sodio, Bicarbonato di sodio, carbonato acido di sodio
ja: E500(ii), 炭酸水素ナトリウム, 炭酸水素Na, 炭酸水素Ｎａ, 重炭酸ナトリウム, 重炭酸Na, 重炭酸Ｎａ, 重曹
kk: E500(ii), Ас содасы
kn: E500(ii), ಸೋಡಿಯಂ ಬೈ ಕಾರ್ಬೋನೇಟ್
ko: E500(ii), 탄산 수소 나트륨
lt: E500(ii), Natrio hidrokarbonatas, Natrio hidrokarbonatas, natrio rūgštusis karbonatas, sodos bikarbonatas
lv: E500(ii), Nātrija hidrogēnkarbonāts, Nātrija bikarbonāts, nātrija skābais karbonāts, nātrija bikarbonāts
ml: E500(ii), സോഡിയം ബൈകാർബണേറ്റ്
mt: E500(ii), Karbonat idroġenat tas-sodju, Bikarbonat tas-sodju, karbonat tal-aċidu tas-sodju, Bikarbonat tas-soda
nb: E500(ii), Natriumbikarbonat, Natriumhydrogenkarbonat
nl: E500(ii), Natriumwaterstofcarbonaat, Natriumbicarbonaat, zuur natriumcarbonaat, dubbelkoolzure soda
nn: E500(ii), natriumvätekarbonat, natriumhydrogenkarbonat
oc: E500(ii), Idrogenocarbonat de sòdi
or: E500(ii), ସୋଡ଼ିଅମ ବାଇକାର୍ବୋନେଟ
pa: E500(ii), ਮਿੱਠਾ ਸੋਡਾ
pl: E500(ii), Wodorowęglan sodu, Diwęglan sodu, kwaśny węglan sodu, diwęglan sodowy, soda oczyszczona
pt: E500(ii), Hidrogenocarbonato de sódio, Bicarbonato de sódio, carbonato ácido de sódio
ro: E500(ii), Bicarbonat de sodiu, Carbonat acid de sodiu, Bicarbonat
ru: E500(ii), натрий двууглекислый, бикарбонат натрия, бикарбонат-натрия
sh: E500(ii), Natrijum hidrogenkarbonat
si: E500(ii), සෝඩියම් බයිකාබනේට්
sk: E500(ii), Hydrogenuhličitan sodný, Hydrogenuhličitan sodný, bikarbonát sodný, sóda bikarbóna
sl: E500(ii), Natrijev hidrogenkarbonat, natrijev bikarbonat, kisli natrijev karbonat, soda bikarbona
so: E500(ii), Saadiyom bicarbonate
sq: E500(ii), Bikarbonati i natriumit
sr: E500(ii), натријум хидрогенкарбонат
sv: E500(ii), Natriumvätekarbonat, Natriumbikarbonat, surt natriumkarbonat, bikarbonat av soda, bikarbonat
sw: E500(ii), Magadi
ta: E500(ii), சமையல் சோடா
te: E500(ii), సోడియం బైకార్బొనేట్
th: E500(ii), โซเดียมไบคาร์บอเนต
tr: E500(ii), Sodyum bikarbonat
uk: E500(ii), Гідрокарбонат натрію
vi: E500(ii), natri bicacbonat
zh: E500(ii), 碳酸氢钠

en: E500(iii), Sodium sesquicarbonate
xx: E500(iii)
bg: E500(iii), Натриев сескикарбонат
cs: E500(iii), Seskviuhličitan sodný
da: E500(iii), natriumsesquikarbonat, natriumsesquicarbonat
de: E500(iii), Natriumsesquicarbonat
el: E500(iii), Σεσκιανθρακικο νατριο
eo: E500(iii), Natria seskvikarbonato
es: E500(iii), Sesquicarbonato de sodio
et: E500(iii), Naatriumseskvikarbonaat
fi: E500(iii), Natriumseskvikarbonaatti, Natriumseskvikarbonaattia
fr: E500(iii), Sesquicarbonate de sodium
hu: E500(iii), Nátrium-szeszkvikarbonát
hy: E500(iii), Տրինատրիումի հիդրոկարբոնատ
it: E500(iii), E500(iii), Sesquicarbonato di sodio
ja: E500(iii), セスキ炭酸ナトリウム
jv: E500(iii), sodium sesquicarbonate
lt: E500(iii), Natrio seskvikarbonatas
lv: E500(iii), Nātrija seskvikarbonāts
mt: E500(iii), Seskwikarbonat tas-sodju
nl: E500(iii), Natriumsesquicarbonaat
pl: E500(iii), Półtorawęglan sodu
pt: E500(iii), Sesquicarbonato de sódio
ro: E500(iii), Sescvicarbonat de sodiu
ru: E500(iii), Гидрокарбонат тринатрия
sh: E500(iii), Natrijum seskvikarbonat
sk: E500(iii), Seskviuhličitan sodný
sl: E500(iii), Natrijev seskvikarbonat
sr: E500(iii), Natrijum seskvikarbonat
sv: E500(iii), Natriumseskvikarbonat
zh: E500(iii), 鈉倍半

en: E501, Potassium carbonates
xx: E501
bg: E501, калиеви карбонати
ca: E501, carbonats de potassi
da: E501, kaliumkarbonater, kaliumcarbonater
de: E501, Kaliumcarbonate, Kaliumcarbonaten
el: E501, ανθρακικά άλατα καλίου
es: E501, Carbonatos de potasio
et: E501, kaaliumkarbonaadid
fi: E501, kaliumkarbonaatit
fr: E501, Carbonates de potassium
hr: E501
hu: E501, Kálium-karbonátok
it: E501, Carbonati di potassio
lt: E501, kalio karbonatai
mt: E501, karbonati tal-potassju
nl: E501, Kaliumcarbonaten
pl: E501, Węglany potasu
pt: E501, Carbonatos de potássio
ro: E501, Carbonați de potasiu
sk: E501, uhličitany draselné
sv: E501, Kaliumkarbonater

en: E501(i), Potassium carbonate
xx: E501(i)
ar: E501(i), كربونات البوتاسيوم
bg: E501(i), Калиев карбонат
bn: E501(i), পটাসিয়াম কার্বনেট
ca: E501(i), Carbonat de potassi
cs: E501(i), Uhličitan draselný, Potaš, K2CO3, Kalcinované draslo
da: E501(i), kaliumkarbonat, kaliumcarbonat, Potaske
de: E501(i), Kaliumcarbonat, Pottasche, Kaliumkarbonat
el: E501(i), Ανθρακικα αλατα του καλιου
eo: E501(i), kalia karbonato
es: E501(i), Carbonato de potasio, Carbonato potásico
et: E501(i), Kaaliumkarbonaat sünonüümid
fa: E501(i), پتاسیم کربنات
fi: E501(i), Kaliumkarbonaatti, Kaliumkarbonaattia
fr: E501(i), Carbonate de potassium
he: E501(i), אשלג
hi: E501(i), पोटासियम कार्बोनेट
hr: E501(i), kalijevi karbonati
hu: E501(i), Kálium-karbonát
hy: E501(i), Կալիումի կարբոնատ
id: E501(i), Potasium karbonat
io: E501(i), Potaso
is: E501(i), Pottaska
it: E501(i), Carbonato di potassio, Potassa
ja: E501(i), 炭酸カリウム, 炭酸K, 炭酸Ｋ
kk: E501(i), Сақар
ko: E501(i), 탄산 칼륨
ky: E501(i), Калий карбонаты
la: E501(i), Potassa
lt: E501(i), Kalio karbonatas
lv: E501(i), Kālija karbonāts, Potašs, Potaša
mt: E501(i), Karbonat tal-potassju
nb: E501(i), kaliumkarbonat, pottaske
nl: E501(i), Kaliumcarbonaat
nn: E501(i), kaliumkarbonat, pottaske
pl: E501(i), Węglan potasu
pt: E501(i), Carbonato de potássio
ro: E501(i), Carbonat de potasiu
ru: E501(i), Карбонат калия
sh: E501(i), Kalijum karbonat
sk: E501(i), Uhličitan draselný
sl: E501(i), Kalijev karbonat
sr: E501(i), калијум карбонат
sv: E501(i), Kaliumkarbonat
ta: E501(i), பொட்டாசியம் கார்பனேட்டு
te: E501(i), పొటాషియం కార్బోనేట్
th: E501(i), โพแทสเซียมคาร์บอเนต
uk: E501(i), Карбонат калію
ur: E501(i), اُشنان
vi: E501(i), Kali cacbonat
zh: E501(i), 碳酸鉀

en: E501(ii), Potassium hydrogen carbonate, Potassium bicarbonate
xx: E501(ii)
bg: E501(ii), Калиев хидроген карбонат, Калиев бикарбонат
cs: E501(ii), Hydrogenuhličitan draselný, Bikarbonát draselný
da: E501(ii), kaliumhydrogenkarbonat, kaliumbikarbonat, kaliumhydrogencarbonat, kaliumbicarbonat
de: E501(ii), Kaliumhydrogencarbonat, Kaliumbicarbonat
el: E501(ii), Οξινο ανθρακικο καλιο, Διττανθρακικό κάλιο
eo: E501(ii), Kalia bikarbonato
es: E501(ii), Bicarbonato de potasio, Carbonato ácido de potasio, Bicarbonato potásico
et: E501(ii), Kaaliumvesinikkarbonaat
fa: E501(ii), بی‌کربنات پتاسیم
fi: E501(ii), Kaliumvetykarbonaatti, Kaliumbikarbonaatti, Kaliumvetykarbonaattia, Kaliumbikarbonaattia
fr: E501(ii), Carbonate acide de potassium, Bicarbonate de potassium
hi: E501(ii), पोटासियम बाइकार्बोनेट
hu: E501(ii), Kálium-hidrogén-karbonát, Kálium-bikarbonát
it: E501(ii), Carbonato acido di potassio
ja: E501(ii), 炭酸水素カリウム
lt: E501(ii), Kalio hidrokarbonatas, Kalio bikarbonatas
lv: E501(ii), Kālija hidrogēnkarbonāts, Kālija bikarbonāts
mt: E501(ii), Karbonat idroġenat tal-potassju, Bikarbonat tal-potassju
nl: E501(ii), Kaliumwaterstofcarbonaat, Kaliumbicarbonaat
nn: E501(ii), kaliumhydrogenkarbonat, kaliumbikarbonat
pl: E501(ii), Wodorowęglan potasu, Diwęglan potasu
pt: E501(ii), Hidrogenocarbonato de potássio, Bicarbonato de potássio
ro: E501(ii), Bicarbonat de potasiu
ru: E501(ii), гидрокарбонат калия
sh: E501(ii), Kalijum bikarbonat
sk: E501(ii), Hydrogenuhličitan draselný, Hydrogenuhličitan draselný
sl: E501(ii), Kalijev hidrogenkarbonat, kalijev bikarbonat
sr: E501(ii), Kalijum bikarbonat
sv: E501(ii), Kaliumvätekarbonat, Kaliumbikarbonat
ta: E501(ii), பொட்டாசியம் பைகார்பனேட்
te: E501(ii), పొటాషియం బైకార్బోనేట్
vi: E501(ii), Kali bicacbonat
zh: E501(ii), 碳酸氢钾

en: E502, Carbonates
xx: E502
bg: E502, Карбонати
cs: E502, Uhličitany
da: E502, karbonater, carbonater
de: E502, Carbonate
el: E502, Ανθρακικά
es: E502, Carbonatos
et: E502, Karbonaadid
fi: E502, Karbonaatit, Karbonaatteja
fr: E502, Carbonates
hu: E502, Karbonátok
it: E502, Carbonati
lt: E502, Karbonatai
lv: E502, Karbonāti
mt: E502, Karbonati
nl: E502, Carbonaten
pl: E502, Węglany
pt: E502, Carbonatos
ro: E502, Carbonați
sk: E502, Uhličitany
sl: E502, Karbonati
sv: E502, Carbonater

en: E503, Ammonium carbonates
xx: E503
bg: E503, Амониеви карбонати
ca: E503, carbonatos de amonio, carbonats d'amoni
cs: E503, Uhličitany amonné
da: E503, ammoniumkarbonater, ammoniumcarbonater
de: E503, Ammoniumcarbonate
el: E503, Αμμωνιακά άλατα
es: E503, Carbonatos de amonio
et: E503, Ammooniumkarbonaadid
fi: E503, ammoniumkarbonaatit
fr: E503, Carbonates d'ammonium
hr: E503, Amonijevi karbonati
hu: E503, ammónium-karbonátok
it: E503, Carbonati d'ammonio, carbonati di ammonio
lt: E503, Amonio karbonatai
lv: E503, Amonija karbonāti
mt: E503, Karbonati tal-ammonju
nl: E503, Ammoniumcarbonaten
pl: E503, węglany amonu
pt: E503, Carbonatos de amónio
ro: E503, Carbonați de amoniu
ru: E503, Карбонаты аммония
sk: E503, Amoniakové uhličitany
sl: E503, Amonijevi karbonati
sv: E503, Ammoniumkarbonater

en: E503(i), Ammonium carbonate
xx: E503(i)
af: E503(i), Ammoniumkarbonaat
ar: E503(i), كربونات الأمونيوم
bg: E503(i), Амониев карбонат
ca: E503(i), Carbonat d'amoni
cs: E503(i), Uhličitan amonný
da: E503(i), ammoniumkarbonat, ammoniumcarbonat
de: E503(i), Ammoniumcarbonat
el: E503(i), Ανθρακικα αλατα του αμμωνιου
eo: E503(i), Amonia karbonato
es: E503(i), Carbonato de amonio, Carbonato amónico, carbonato de aminiaco
et: E503(i), Ammooniumkarbonaat
fa: E503(i), آمونیوم کربنات
fi: E503(i), Ammoniumkarbonaatti, Ammoniumkarbonaattia
fr: E503(i), Carbonate d'ammonium
hr: E503(i), amonijev karbonat
hu: E503(i), Ammónium-karbonát
hy: E503(i), Ամոնիումի կարբոնատ
id: E503(i), Amonium karbonat
is: E503(i), Hjartarsalt
it: E503(i), Carbonato d'ammonio, carbonato di ammonio
ja: E503(i), 炭酸アンモニウム
ko: E503(i), 탄산 암모늄
lt: E503(i), Amonio karbonatas
lv: E503(i), Amonija karbonāts
mt: E503(i), Karbonat tal-ammonju
nl: E503(i), Ammoniumcarbonaat
nn: E503(i), ammoniumkarbonat
pl: E503(i), Węglan amonu
pt: E503(i), Carbonato de amónio
ro: E503(i), Carbonat de amoniu
ru: E503(i), карбонат аммония
sh: E503(i), Amonijum karbonat
sk: E503(i), Uhličitan amónny
sl: E503(i), Amonijev karbonat
sr: E503(i), Amonijum karbonat
sv: E503(i), Ammoniumkarbonat
th: E503(i), แอมโมเนียมคาร์บอเนต
uz: E503(i), Ammoniy karbonat
vi: E503(i), Amoni cacbonat
zh: E503(i), 碳酸铵

en: E503(ii), Ammonium hydrogen carbonate, Baker's ammonia, Sal volatile, Salt of hartshorn, Ammonium bicarbonate
xx: E503(ii)
ar: E503(ii), بيكربونات الأمونيوم
bg: E503(ii), Амониев хидроген карбонат, Амониев бикарбонат, Амониев хидрогенкарбонат
ca: E503(ii), carbonat àcid d'amoni, bicarbonato amonico, gasificant E503II
cs: E503(ii), Hydrogenuhličitan amonný
da: E503(ii), ammoniumhydrogenkarbonat, ammoniumhydrogencarbonat, hjortetakssalt
de: E503(ii), Ammoniumhydrogencarbonat, Ammonium-hydrogencarbonat, Ammoniumbicarbonat, Hirschhornsalz
el: E503(ii), Οξινο ανθρακικο αμμωνιο
eo: E503(ii), Amonia bikarbonato
es: E503(ii), Bicarbonato de amonio, Carbonato ácido de amonio, Bicarbonato amónico, bicarbonatado de amonio
et: E503(ii), Ammooniumvesinikkarbonaat
fa: E503(ii), بی‌کربنات آمونیوم
fi: E503(ii), Ammoniumvetykarbonaatti, Ammoniumvetykarbonaattia, hirvensarvisuola
fr: E503(ii), Carbonate acide d'ammonium, bicarbonate d'ammonium
gl: E503(ii), Bicarbonato amónico
hi: E503(ii), अमोनियम बाईकार्बोनेट
hr: E503(ii), amonijev hidrogen karbonat, amonijev hidrogenkarbonat, amonijev bikarbonat
hu: E503(ii), Ammónium-hidrogén-karbonát
is: E503(ii), Ammoníumbíkarbónat
it: E503(ii), Carbonato acido di ammonio, carbonato acido d'ammonio, Bicarbonato di ammonio
ja: E503(ii), 炭酸水素アンモニウム
ko: E503(ii), 탄산 수소 암모늄
lt: E503(ii), Amonio hidrokarbonatas
lv: E503(ii), Amonija hidrogēnkarbonāts
mk: E503(ii), Амониум бикарбонат
mt: E503(ii), Karbonat idroġenat tal-ammonju
nb: E503(ii), Ammoniumhydrogenkarbonat, Ammoniumbikarbonat
nl: E503(ii), Ammoniumwaterstofcarbonaat, ammoniumbicarbonaat
nn: E503(ii), Hjortetakksalt
pl: E503(ii), Wodorowęglan amonu
pt: E503(ii), Hidrogenocarbonato de amónio, carbonato ácido de amónio
ro: E503(ii), Bicarbonat de amoniu, Carbonat acid de amoniu
ru: E503(ii), гидрокарбонат аммония
sh: E503(ii), Amonijum bikarbonat
sk: E503(ii), Hydrogenuhličitan amónny
sl: E503(ii), Amonijev hidrogenkarbonat
sr: E503(ii), Amonijum bikarbonat, aditiv sredstvo za dizanje testa E503ii
sv: E503(ii), ammoniumvätekarbonat, hjorthornssalt
te: E503(ii), అమ్మోనియం బైకార్బొనేట్
th: E503(ii), แอมโมเนียมไบคาร์บอเนต
zh: E503(ii), 碳酸氢铵

en: E504, Magnesium carbonates
xx: E504
bg: E504, Магнезиеви карбонати
ca: E504, Carbonats de magnesi
cs: E504, Uhličitany hořečnaté
da: E504, magnesiumkarbonater, magnesiumcarbonater
de: E504, Magnesiumcarbonaten, Magnesiumcarbonate
el: E504, Ανθρακικά μαγνήσια
es: E504, Carbonatos de magnesio
et: E504, Magneesiumkarbonaadid
fi: E504, Magnesiumkarbonaatit
fr: E504, Carbonates de magnésium
hu: E504, Magnézium-karbonátok
it: E504, Carbonati di magnesio
lt: E504, Magnio karbonatai
lv: E504, Magnija karbonāti
mt: E504, Karbonati tal-magniżju
nl: E504, Magnesiumcarbonaten
pl: E504, Węglany magnezu
pt: E504, Carbonatos de magnésio
ro: E504, Carbonați de magneziu
sk: E504, Uhličitany hořečnaté
sl: E504, Magnezijevi karbonati
sv: E504, Magnesiumkarbonater

en: E504(i), Magnesium carbonate
xx: E504(i)
ar: E504(i), كربونات المغنسيوم
bg: E504(i), Магнезиев карбонат
bs: E504(i), Magnezijum karbonat
ca: E504(i), Carbonat de magnesi
cs: E504(i), Uhličitan hořečnatý
da: E504(i), magnesiumkarbonat, magnesiumcarbonat
de: E504(i), Magnesiumcarbonat
el: E504(i), Ανθρακικό μαγνήσιο, Ανθρακικα αλατα του μαγνησιου
eo: E504(i), magnezia karbonato
es: E504(i), Carbonato de magnesio
et: E504(i), Magneesiumkarbonaat
fa: E504(i), منیزیم کربنات
fi: E504(i), Magnesiumkarbonaatti, Magnesiumkarbonaattia
fr: E504(i), Carbonate de magnésium
ga: E504(i), carbónáit mhaignéisiam
hi: E504(i), मैग्निसियम कार्बोनेट
hr: E504(i), magnezijev karbonat
hu: E504(i), Magnézium-karbonát
it: E504(i), Carbonato di magnesio
ja: E504(i), 炭酸マグネシウム, 炭酸Mg, 炭酸Ｍｇ
ky: E504(i), Магний карбонаты
lt: E504(i), Magnio karbonatas
lv: E504(i), Magnija karbonāts
mt: E504(i), Karbonat tal-manjeżju
nb: E504(i), Magnesiumkarbonat
nl: E504(i), Magnesiumcarbonaat
nn: E504(i), magnesiumkarbonat
pl: E504(i), Węglan magnezu
pt: E504(i), Carbonato de magnésio
ro: E504(i), Carbonat de magneziu
ru: E504(i), карбонат магния
sh: E504(i), Magnezijum karbonat
sk: E504(i), Uhličitan horečnatý
sl: E504(i), Magnezijev karbonat
sr: E504(i), магнезијум карбонат
sv: E504(i), Magnesiumkarbonat
ta: E504(i), மக்னீசியம் கார்பனேட்டு
th: E504(i), แมกนีเซียมคาร์บอเนต
uk: E504(i), Карбонат магнію
vi: E504(i), magie cacbonat
zh: E504(i), 碳酸鎂

en: E504(ii), Magnesium hydroxide carbonate
xx: E504(ii)
bg: E504(ii), Магнезиев хидрокси карбонат
cs: E504(ii), Uhličitan-dihydroxid hořečnatý
da: E504(ii), magnesiumhydroxidkarbonat, magnesiumhydroxidcarbonat
de: E504(ii), Magnesiumhydroxidcarbonat
el: E504(ii), Ανθρακικο υδροξειδιο του μαγνησιου
es: E504(ii), Carbonato ácido de magnesio
et: E504(ii), Magneesiumvesinikkarbonaat
fi: E504(ii), Magnesiumhydroksikarbonaatti, Magnesiumhydroksikarbonaattia
fr: E504(ii), Carbonate acide de magnésium
hu: E504(ii), Magnézium-hidroxid-karbonát
it: E504(ii), Magnesio carbonato idrossido
lt: E504(ii), Magnio hidroksido karbonatas
lv: E504(ii), Magnija hidroksīdkarbonāts
mt: E504(ii), Karbonat tal-idrossidu tal-manjeżju
nl: E504(ii), Magnesiumcarbonaathydroxide
pl: E504(ii), Hydroksywęglan magnezu
pt: E504(ii), Hidroxicarbonato de magnésio
ro: E504(ii), Hidroxid de carbonat de magneziu
sk: E504(ii), Hydrogenuhličitan horečnatý
sl: E504(ii), Magnezijev hidroksidkarbonat
sv: E504(ii), Magnesiumhydroxidkarbonat

en: E505, Ferrous carbonate
xx: E505, 3b101
bg: E505, Желязен карбонат
cs: E505, Uhličitan železnatý
da: E505, jernkarbonat, jerncarbonat
de: E505, Eisen(II)-carbonat
el: E505, Ανθρακικός σίδηρος
es: E505, Carbonato ferroso
et: E505, Raudkarbonaat
fi: E505, Rautakarbonaatti, Rautakarbonaattia
fr: E505, Carbonate de fer, Carbonate ferreux
hu: E505, Vas-(II)-karbonát, Vas-karbonát
it: E505, Carbonato ferroso
lt: E505, Geležies(II) karbonatas
lv: E505, Dzelzs karbonāts
mt: E505, Karbonat ferruż
nl: E505, Ferrocarbonaat, IJzer(II)carbonaat
pl: E505, Węglan żelaza
pt: E505, Carbonato ferroso
ro: E505, Carbonat ferros
sk: E505, Uhličitan železnatý
sl: E505, Železov(II) karbonat
sv: E505, Järnkarbonat

en: E507, Hydrochloric acid, Hydrogen chloride
xx: E507
bg: E507, Солна киселина, Хлороводород
ca: E507, Àcid clorhídric, acid clorhidric
cs: E507, Kyselina chlorovodíková, Chloran, E 507, Kyselina solná
da: E507, Saltsyre
de: E507, Salzsäure, E 507, Chlorwasserstoffsäure, Acidum hydrochloricum, Hydrochlorsäure
el: E507, Υδροχλωρικο οξυ, Υδροχλώριο
es: E507, Ácido clorhídrico, Cloruro de hidrógeno, Acido hidroclorico, Ácido clorídrico, Ácido muriatico, Clorhidrato, Salfumán, E 507, Agua fuerte, Clorhidrico, Salfumant
et: E507, Soolhape, Vesinikkloriidhape
fi: E507, Suolahappo, Kloorivety, Vetykloridihappo, Vetykloridi, Suolahappoa, Kloorivetyä, Vetykloridihappoa, Vetykloridia
fr: E507, Acide chlorhydrique, Chlorure d'hydrogène, Acide muriatique, Esprit de sel, Acide chlorhydrique officinal, 7674-01-0, HCl•2H2O, 13465-05-9
hr: E507
hu: E507, Sósav, Hidrogén-klorid
it: E507, Acido cloridrico, Cloruro di idrogeno, Spirito di sale, acido muriatico
lt: E507, Vandenilio chlorido rūgštis, Vandenilio chloridas, Druskos rūgštis
lv: E507, Sālskābe, Hlorūdeņradis, Sālsskābe, Hlorūdeņražskābe
mt: E507, Aċidu idrokloriku, Klorur tal-idroġenu
nl: E507, Zoutzuur
pl: E507, Kwas chlorowodorowy, Chlorowodór, Kwas solny, Zajzajer, HCl aq, Zalzajer
pt: E507, Ácido clorídrico, Cloreto de hidrogénio, Ácido muriático, Ácido hidroclórico
ro: E507, Acid clorhidric, Clorură de hidrogen, Acid muriatic
sk: E507, Kyselina chlorovodíková, Chlorovodík, Kyselina soľná
sl: E507, Klorovodikova kislina, vodikov klorid, Želodčna kislina, Solna kislina
sv: E507, Saltsyra, Väteklorid, Kloran, E 507, Vätekloridgas, Klorvätesyra, Klorväte

en: E508, Potassium chloride, Sylvine
xx: E508
bg: E508, Калиев хлорид, Силвин
ca: E508, Clorur de potassi, clorur potàssic
cs: E508, Chlorid draselný, Drasloš
da: E508, Kaliumchlorid, Kaliumklorid
de: E508, Kaliumchlorid, Sylvin
el: E508, Χλωριουχο καλιο, Συλβίνης
es: E508, Cloruro de potasio, Silvina, Cloruro potásico
et: E508, Kaaliumkloriid, Sülviin
fi: E508, Kaliumkloridi, Sylviini, Kaliumkloridia, Sylviiniä
fr: E508, Chlorure de potassium, Sylvine
hr: E508
hu: E508, Kálium-klorid, Szilvin
it: E508, Cloruro di potassio, Silvine, Cloruro potassico
lt: E508, Kalio chloridas, Silvinas
lv: E508, Kālija hlorīds, Silvins
mt: E508, Klorur tal-potassju, Silvin
nl: E508, Kaliumchloride
no: E508, kaliumklorid
pl: E508, Chlorek potasu
pt: E508, Cloreto de potássio, Silvina
ro: E508, Clorură de potasiu, Silvină
sk: E508, Chlorid draselný, Sylvín
sl: E508, Kalijev klorid
sv: E508, Kaliumklorid, Sylvin

en: E509, Calcium chloride
xx: E509
af: E509, Kalsiumchloried
ar: E509, كلوريد الكالسيوم
bg: E509, Калциев хлорид, калциев дихлорид, калциев двухлорид
bn: E509, ক্যালসিয়াম ক্লোরাইড
ca: E509, Clorur de calci, clorur càlcic
cs: E509, Chlorid vápenatý, CaCl2
cy: E509, calsiwm clorid
da: E509, Calciumchlorid, Kalciumklorid, CaCl2, Calciumklorid
de: E509, Calciumchlorid, CaCl2, E 509, Chlorcalcium, Kalziumchlorid
el: E509, Χλωριουχο ασβεστιο
eo: E509, kalcia klorido
es: E509, Cloruro de calcio, Cloruro cálcico
et: E509, Kaltsiumkloriid
fa: E509, کلرید کلسیم
fi: E509, Kalsiumkloridi, Maantiesuola, Kalsiumkloridia, Maantiesuolaa
fr: E509, Chlorure de calcium, CaCl2
gl: E509, Cloruro de calcio
hi: E509, कैल्सियम क्लोराइड
hr: E509, kalcijev klorid, kalcij klorid
hu: E509, Kalcium-klorid
hy: E509, Կալցիումի քլորիդ
id: E509, Kalsium klorida
it: E509, Cloruro di calcio, CaCl2, Dicloruro di calcio, Calcio cloruro
ja: E509, 塩化カルシウム, 塩化Ca, 塩化Ｃａ
ko: E509, 염화 칼슘
ky: E509, Кальций хлориди
lt: E509, Kalcio chloridas
lv: E509, Kalcija hlorīds, CaCl2
ms: E509, Kalsium klorida
mt: E509, Klorur tal-kalċju
nb: E509, Kalsiumklorid
nl: E509, Calciumchloride, CaCl, CaCl2
nn: E509, kalsiumklorid
pl: E509, Chlorek wapnia, CaCl2, Chlorek wapniowy
pt: E509, Cloreto de cálcio, CaCl2
ro: E509, Clorură de calciu
ru: E509, Хлорид кальция, CaCl2, Хлористый кальций, Кальция хлорид, Хлорид кальция(II), уплотнитель хлорид кальция
sh: E509, Kalcijum hlorid
sk: E509, Chlorid vápenatý
sl: E509, Kalcijev klorid
sr: E509, калцијум хлорид
sv: E509, Kalciumklorid
ta: E509, கல்சியம் குளோரைட்டு
te: E509, కాల్సియం క్లోరైడ్
tr: E509, Kalsiyum klorür
uk: E509, Кальцій хлористий
vi: E509, canxi clorua
zh: E509, 氯化钙

en: E510, ammonium chloride, ammonia solution, salmiac
xx: E510
af: E510, Ammoniumchloried
ar: E510, كلوريد الأمونيوم
bg: E510, Амониев хлорид
bn: E510, অ্যামোনিয়াম ক্লোরাইড
bs: E510, Amonijum hlorid
ca: E510, clorur d'amoni, clorur amònic
cs: E510, Chlorid amonný
cy: E510, Amoniwm clorid
da: E510, ammoniumklorid, salmiak, ammoniumchlorid
de: E510, Ammoniumchlorid
el: E510, Χλωριούχο αμμώνιο
eo: E510, Amonia klorido
es: E510, Cloruro de amonio
et: E510, Ammooniumkloriid
fa: E510, آمونیوم کلرید
fi: E510, ammoniumkloridi, salmiakki, salmiakkia, ammoniumkloridia
fr: E510, Chlorure d'ammonium
he: E510, אמוניום כלוריד
hi: E510, नौसादर
hr: E510, Amonijev klorid
hu: E510, Ammónium-klorid
hy: E510, Ամոնիումի քլորիդ
id: E510, amonium klorida
is: E510, Ammoníumklóríð, salmíaksalt
it: E510, Cloruro d'ammonio
ja: E510, 塩化アンモニウム
jv: E510, Amonium klorida
ka: E510, ამონიუმქლორიდი
ko: E510, 염화 암모늄
ku: E510, Amonyûmklorîd
ky: E510, Аммоний хлориди
lv: E510, amonija hlorīds
ml: E510, navasaram
ms: E510, Amonium klorida
my: E510, ဇဝက်သာ
nb: E510, Salmiakk
nl: E510, Ammoniumchloride, salmiakzout
nn: E510, ammoniumklorid
pa: E510, ਨਸਾਦਰ
pl: E510, chlorek amonu
pt: E510, cloreto de amónio
ro: E510, Clorură de amoniu
ru: E510, хлорид аммония
sh: E510, Amonijum hlorid
sk: E510, Chlorid amónny
sl: E510, Amonijev klorid
sr: E510, амонијум хлорид
sv: E510, salmiak, ammoniumklorid
ta: E510, அம்மோனியம் குளோரைடு
te: E510, అమ్మోనియం క్లోరైడ్
tg: E510, Навшодир
th: E510, แอมโมเนียมคลอไรด์
tr: E510, Amonyum klorür
uk: E510, хлорид амонію
ur: E510, نشادر
uz: E510, Ammoniy xlorid
vi: E510, Amoni clorua
zh: E510, 氯化铵

en: E511, Magnesium chloride
xx: E511
bg: E511, Магнезиев хлорид, Магнезиев дихлорид
ca: E511, Clorur de magnesi, clorur magnèsic
cs: E511, Chlorid hořečnatý
da: E511, Magnesiumchlorid
de: E511, Magnesiumchlorid
el: E511, Χλωριουχο μαγνησιο
es: E511, Cloruro de magnesio, Cloruro magnésico
et: E511, Magneesiumkloriid
fi: E511, Magnesiumkloridi, Magnesiumkloridia
fr: E511, Chlorure de magnésium
hu: E511, Magnézium-klorid
it: E511, Cloruro di magnesio
ja: E511, 塩化マグネシウム
lt: E511, Magnio chloridas
lv: E511, Magnija hlorīds
mt: E511, Klorur tal-manjeżju
nl: E511, Magnesiumchloride
pl: E511, Chlorek magnezu
pt: E511, Cloreto de magnésio
ro: E511, Clorură de magneziu
sk: E511, Chlorid horečnatý
sl: E511, Magnezijev klorid
sv: E511, Magnesiumklorid